Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201879-760.02
Academic content standards; school districts; duties.

In accordance with timelines that are adopted by the State Board of Education, but in no event later than one year following the adoption or modification of state standards, each school district shall adopt measurable quality academic content standards in the subject areas of reading, writing, mathematics, science, and social studies. The standards may be the same as, or may be equal to or exceed in rigor, the measurable academic content standards adopted by the state board and shall cover at least the same grade levels. School districts may work collaboratively with educational service units, with learning communities, or through interlocal agreements to develop such standards.

Laws 2000, LB 812, § 3;

Laws 2007, LB653, § 6;

Laws 2008, LB1157, § 3;

Laws 2015, LB525, § 12.